Missouri, session 2026, HB2074.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 173, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 173.237, to read as follows:
173.237. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Disabled Veterans' Dependents Tuition Waiver".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Board", the coordinating board for higher education;
(2) "Institution", any approved public institution, as defined in subdivision (3) of
subsection 1 of section 173.1102;
(3) "Tuition", any tuition or incidental fee, or both, charged by an institution for
attendance at the institution by a student as a resident of this state, but not to exceed the
amount of tuition charged to a Missouri resident at the University of Missouri-
Columbia for attendance.
3. A dependent of a veteran shall be eligible for a waiver of all tuition remaining
due to an institution after subtracting awarded federal financial aid grants and state
scholarships and grants if the dependent meets the following requirements:
(1) The dependent is a resident of this state who meets the institution's
requirements for establishing Missouri residency for the purpose of paying in-state
tuition;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2074 2
(2) The dependent has a parent, step-parent, or spouse who is or was a member
of the Armed Forces of the United States and who:
(a) Died while on active duty;
(b) Died of a service-connected disability;
(c) Died subsequent to discharge from the Armed Forces of the United States as
a result of injury or illness sustained while serving as a member of the Armed Forces of
the United States, whether the injury or illness resulted in total disability;
(d) Is rated as permanently and totally disabled as a result of military service as
certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, excluding temporary
total disability ratings or other temporary disability ratings given for conditions
expected to improve, but including ratings for total disability based on individual
unemployability if the unemployability is permanent; or
(e) Is classified as missing in action or as a prisoner of war during armed
hostilities while serving as a member of the Armed Forces of the United States; and
(3) If the dependent is a child or stepchild of a veteran described in subdivision
(2) of this subsection, such dependent shall be under twenty-six years of age unless the
dependent serves on active duty with the Armed Forces of the United States after such
dependent's eighteenth birthday but before such dependent's twenty-sixth birthday, in
which case the eligibility period shall end five years after the date of the dependent's
first discharge or release from duty from the Armed Forces of the United States, but in
no event shall such eligibility period be extended beyond the dependent's thirty-first
birthday.
4. An application for a tuition waiver shall be submitted on a form to be
prescribed by the executive director of the Missouri veterans' commission. The
executive director shall ensure that the application process is accessible, transparent,
and efficiently administered.
5. The executive director of the Missouri veterans' commission or the executive
director's designee shall:
(1) Establish application procedures by prescribing and providing all necessary
forms, setting application deadlines, and determining required documentation for
dependents of disabled veterans to apply for the tuition waiver;
(2) Review and determine applicant eligibility, verify documentation, and certify
approved applicants. Upon an applicant's certification, the executive director shall
notify the applicant and the institution in which the applicant desires to enroll. The
executive director's decision shall be final and binding, absent fraud or
misrepresentation;

HB 2074 3
(3) Promulgate necessary rules and regulations to ensure effective
administration of this section, including procedures for eligibility verification, fraud
prevention, and program oversight;
(4) Coordinate with the board to facilitate communication with institutions,
ensure proper implementation of waivers, and maintain program efficiency; and
(5) Oversee program compliance and reporting by maintaining records of
waiver recipients, monitoring participation, and providing periodic reports to the
board.
6. The board shall:
(1) Ensure consistent implementation of this section across all institutions,
including institutional compliance and reporting;
(2) Develop and distribute procedures and guidelines for institutions to process
tuition waivers, ensuring that certified applicants are enrolled without tuition charges;
and
(3) Coordinate with the Missouri veterans' commission to ensure seamless
communication between certifying authorities and institutions, preventing
administrative delays for eligible applicants.
7. The waiver shall be valid for one degree, diploma, or certificate from a
community college and one baccalaureate degree from a state college or university.
Receipt of such degree, diploma, or certificate from a community college shall precede
receipt of such baccalaureate degree.
8. (1) A recipient of a tuition waiver pursuant to this section shall be ineligible
for any other state-funded, veteran-dependent tuition grant, waiver, or scholarship
including, but not limited to, grants established in sections 173.234 and 173.236.
(2) A student who has previously received any other state-funded, veteran-
dependent tuition grant, waiver, or scholarship including, but not limited to, grants
established in sections 173.234 and 173.236 shall not be eligible to receive a tuition
waiver pursuant to this section.
(3) A student shall not concurrently receive a tuition waiver pursuant to this
section and any other state-funded, veteran-dependent tuition grant, waiver, or
scholarship including, but not limited to, grants established in sections 173.234 and
173.236, but such student may elect to use the program that provides the greatest
financial benefit.
9. A recipient of a tuition waiver pursuant to this section may transfer from one
institution to another without losing such recipient's entitlement to such tuition waiver.
10. If a recipient of a tuition waiver pursuant to this section is granted financial
assistance under any other student aid program, whether public or private, the full

HB 2074 4
amount of such financial assistance shall be reported to the Missouri veterans'
commission by the institution and the recipient.
11. The Missouri veterans' commission shall promulgate all necessary rules for
the implementation of the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
100 and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔